src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SFX   ender  ndase ender
SFX   entar  ntense entar
SFX   entar  ntese entar
SFX   entrar  ntrense entrar
SFX   entrar  ntrese entrar
SFX   e ar   ense e ar
SFX   e ar   ese e ar
SFX   erar  rense erar
SFX   erar  rese erar
SFX   ercar  rquense ercar
SFX   ercar  rquese ercar
SFX   ergir  rjanse ergir
SFX   ergir  rjase ergir
SFX   gir j monos gir
SFX   ervar  rvense ervar
SFX   ervar  rvese ervar
SFX   escar  squense escar
SFX   escar  squese escar
SFX   estar  stense estar
SFX   estar  stese estar
SFX   eter  tanse eter
SFX   eter  tase eter
SFX   evar  vense evar
SFX   evar  vese evar
SFX   ever  vanse ever
SFX   ever  vase ever
SFX   ezclar  zclense ezclar
SFX   ezclar  zclese ezclar
SFX   ibir  banse ibir
SFX   ibir  base ibir
SFX   ibrar  brense ibrar
SFX   ibrar  brese ibrar
SFX   icar  quense icar
SFX   icar  quese icar
SFX   idar  dense idar
SFX   idar  dese idar
SFX   idir  danse idir
SFX   idir  dase idir
SFX   igar  guense igar
SFX   igar  guese igar
SFX   igir  janse igir
SFX   igir  jase igir
SFX   ignar  gnense ignar
SFX   ignar  gnese ignar
SFX   ijar  jense ijar
SFX   ijar  jese ijar
SFX   illar  llense illar
SFX   illar  llese illar
SFX   imar  mense imar
SFX   imar  mese imar
SFX   impiar  mpiense impiar
SFX   impiar  mpiese impiar
SFX   inar  nense inar
SFX   inar  nese inar
SFX   incar  nquense incar
SFX   incar  nquese incar
SFX   intar  ntense intar
SFX   intar  ntese intar
SFX   irar  rense irar
SFX   irar  rese irar
SFX   itar  tense itar
SFX   itar  tese itar
SFX   itir  tanse itir
SFX   itir  tase itir
SFX   izar  cense izar
SFX   izar  cese izar
SFX   ocar  quense ocar
SFX   ocar  quese ocar
SFX   ochar  chense ochar
SFX   ochar  chese ochar
SFX   odar  dense odar
SFX   odar  dese odar
SFX   oder  danse oder
SFX   oder  dase oder
SFX   oger  janse oger
SFX   oger  jase oger
SFX   ojar  jense ojar
SFX   ojar  jese ojar
SFX   olar  lense olar
SFX   olar  lese olar
SFX   omar  mense omar
SFX   omar  mese omar
SFX   ombrar  mbrense ombrar
SFX   ombrar  mbrese ombrar
SFX   omer  manse omer
SFX   omer  mase omer
SFX   omprar  mprense omprar
SFX   omprar  mprese omprar
SFX   onar  nense onar
SFX   onar  nese onar
SFX   ontar  ntense ontar
SFX   ontar  ntese ontar
SFX   orar  rense orar
SFX   orar  rese orar
SFX   orcar  rquense orcar
SFX   orcar  rquese orcar
SFX   ormar  rmense ormar
SFX   ormar  rmese ormar
SFX   orrer  rranse orrer
SFX   orrer  rrase orrer
SFX   ortar  rtense ortar
SFX   ortar  rtese ortar
SFX   otar  tense otar
SFX   otar  tese otar
SFX   oyar  yense oyar
SFX   oyar  yese oyar
SFX   ubir  banse ubir
SFX   ubir  base ubir
SFX   ubrir  branse ubrir
SFX   ubrir  brase ubrir
SFX   uchar  chense uchar
SFX   uchar  chese uchar
SFX   udar  dense udar
SFX   udar  dese udar
SFX   ulpar  lpense ulpar
SFX   ulpar  lpese ulpar
SFX   ultar  ltense ultar
SFX   ultar  ltese ultar
SFX   umar  mense umar
SFX   umar  mese umar
SFX   umbar  mbense umbar
SFX   umbar  mbese umbar
SFX   umbrar  mbrense umbrar
SFX   umbrar  mbrese umbrar
SFX   umplir  mplanse umplir
SFX   umplir  mplase umplir
SFX   unciar  nciense unciar
SFX   unciar  nciese unciar
SFX   undir  ndanse undir
SFX   undir  ndase undir
SFX   untar  ntense untar
SFX   untar  ntese untar
SFX   upar  pense upar
SFX   upar  pese upar
SFX   urar  rense urar
SFX   urar  rese urar
SFX   urnar  rnense urnar
SFX   urnar  rnese urnar
SFX   uscar  squense uscar
SFX   uscar  squese uscar

SFX   Y 55
SFX   aer  iganse aer
SFX   aer  igase aer
SFX   aer aig monos aer
SFX   ecer  zcanse ecer
SFX   ecer  zcase ecer
SFX   cer zc monos ecer
SFX   egar i guense egar
SFX   egar i guese egar
SFX   ar u monos gar
SFX   endar i ndense endar
SFX   endar i ndese endar
SFX   ar  monos [^gz]ar
SFX   ender i ndanse ender
SFX   ender i ndase ender
SFX   er  monos [^ac]er
SFX   entar i ntense entar
SFX   entar i ntese entar
SFX   erder i rdanse erder
SFX   erder i rdase erder
SFX   errar i rrense errar
SFX   errar i rrese errar
SFX   ertar i rtense ertar
SFX   ertar i rtese ertar
SFX   erter i rtanse erter
SFX   erter i rtase erter
SFX   iar  ense iar
SFX   iar  ese iar
SFX   obar u bense obar
SFX   obar u bese obar
SFX   olar u lense olar
SFX   olar u lese olar
SFX   oltar u ltense oltar
SFX   oltar u ltese oltar
SFX   olver u lvanse olver
SFX   olver u lvase olver
SFX   ontar u ntense ontar
SFX   ontar u ntese ontar
SFX   ontrar u ntrense ontrar
SFX   ontrar u ntrese ontrar
SFX   ordar u rdense ordar
SFX   ordar u rdese ordar
SFX   orzar u rcense orzar
SFX   orzar u rcese orzar
SFX   zar c monos zar
SFX   ostar u stense ostar
SFX   ostar u stese ostar
SFX   ostrar u strense ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strese ostrar
SFX   over u vanse over
SFX   over u vase over
SFX   uar  ense uar
SFX   uar  ese uar
SFX   unir  nanse unir
SFX   unir  nase unir
SFX   ir  monos ir

SFX   Y 66
SFX   cer g monos acer
SFX   acer  ganse acer
SFX   acer  gase acer
SFX   er ig monos aer
SFX   aer  iganse aer
SFX   aer  igase aer
SFX   er g monos [ln]er
SFX   aler  lganse aler
SFX   aler  lgase aler
SFX   ir g monos [ln]ir
SFX   alir  lganse alir
SFX   alir  lgase alir
SFX   ecir ig monos ecir
SFX   ecir  ganse ecir
SFX   ecir  gase ecir
SFX   edir id monos edir
SFX   edir  danse edir
SFX   edir  dase edir
SFX   eguir ig monos eguir
SFX   eguir  ganse eguir
SFX   eguir  gase eguir
SFX   e r i monos e r
SFX   e r  anse e r
SFX   e r  ase e r
SFX   ener  nganse ener
SFX   ener  ngase ener
SFX   enir  nganse enir
SFX   enir  ngase enir
SFX   entir i ntanse entir
SFX   entir i ntase entir
SFX   entir int monos entir
SFX   e ir i  monos e ir
SFX   e ir   anse e ir
SFX   e ir   ase e ir
SFX   er  anse ver
SFX   er  ase ver
SFX   r  monos ver
SFX   erir i ranse erir
SFX   erir i rase erir
SFX   erir ir monos erir
SFX   ervir irv monos ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanse ervir
SFX   ervir  rvase ervir
SFX   ertir i rtanse ertir
SFX   ertir i rtase ertir
SFX   ertir irt monos ertir
SFX   estir ist monos estir
SFX   estir  stanse estir
SFX   estir  stase estir
SFX   etir it monos etir
SFX   etir  tanse etir
SFX   etir  tase etir
SFX   oner  nganse oner
SFX   oner  ngase oner
SFX   orir u ranse orir
SFX   orir u rase orir
SFX   orir ur monos orir
SFX   ormir u rmanse ormir
SFX   ormir u rmase ormir
SFX   ormir urm monos ormir
SFX   ucir  zcanse ucir
SFX   ucir  zcase ucir
SFX   cir zc monos ucir
SFX   uir  yanse uir
SFX   uir  yase uir
SFX   ir y monos uir
